Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 3 Qualifications and Licensing
62-13-319. Reinstatement after failure to pay renewal or retirement fee.

The license of any broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent who fails timely to pay a renewal or retirement fee or to comply with any prerequisite or condition to licensure or renewal may be reinstated without examination within sixty (60) days after the expiration date of the license upon providing proof of compliance with the prerequisites or conditions, including payment of any penalty fee arising from failure to comply with any prerequisite or condition to renewal prior to the expiration date of the license and payment of the renewal fee, plus an additional penalty fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month. Any person desiring reinstatement thereafter must reapply for licensure; provided, however, that the commission may, in its discretion:

Waive reexamination or additional education requirements for such an applicant; or

Reinstate a license subject to the applicant's compliance with reasonable conditions that the commission may prescribe, including payment of a penalty fee, in addition to the penalty fee provided in subsection (a), of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month, or portion of a month, from the time the license expired.

When fees are remitted by mail to the commission, the date of payment shall be determined by the official postmark on the mail.

Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 14; 1989, ch. 89, § 20; 2002, ch. 812, § 8; 2003, ch. 97, § 2.

62-13-320. Surrender of broker's for affiliate broker's license.

The holder of a valid broker's license shall, upon the holder's written request, be entitled to surrender the license to the commission in exchange for an affiliate broker's license.

Acts 1984, ch. 810, § 5.

62-13-321. Escrow or trustee account of deposited funds.

Every broker shall, in accordance with rules promulgated by the commission under § 62-13-203, keep an escrow or trustee account of funds deposited with the broker relating to a real estate transaction. The broker shall maintain for a period of at least (3) years accurate records of the account showing:

The depositor of the funds;

The date of deposit;

The date of withdrawal;

The payee of the funds; and

Other pertinent information that the commission may require.

Acts 1988, ch. 919, § 1.

62-13-322. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1031, § 2, repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 838, § 11, effective July 1, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-13-322 concerned exceptions to the applicability of laws, rules and regulations prohibiting reinstatement or reactivation of a license.

62-13-323. Escrow account — Waiver.

The principal broker of a real estate firm that does not engage in activities that require the acceptance of any funds belonging to others may receive from the Tennessee real estate commission a waiver from § 62-13-321.

Upon receipt of a waiver by the Tennessee real estate commission pursuant to subsection (a), a principal broker may close the real estate firm's escrow account.

The principal broker of a real estate firm authorized pursuant to this section to operate without an escrow account may accept funds belonging to others subject to the following:

The principal broker shall open an escrow account within one (1) business day of accepting the deposit and deposit the funds into the newly opened escrow account on the same day; and

The principal broker shall notify the Tennessee real estate commission within one (1) business day after opening a new escrow account and shall provide the following information:

The name and address of the bank where the new escrow account was opened;

The name of the new escrow account; and

The account identification number of the new escrow account.

A principal broker who opens an escrow account pursuant to subsection (c) shall acknowledge responsibility to operate under all the requirements of § 62-13-321.

No principal broker may obtain a waiver pursuant to subsection (a) for the same real estate firm more than once each license renewal period.

Acts 2002, ch. 553, § 1.

62-13-324. Real estate continuing education instructors — Course requirements.

In order to be eligible for approval by the commission, a course in real estate designed to meet the educational requirements established in § 62-13-303 shall be under the personal and direct supervision of an instructor who:

Has completed a Tennessee real estate commission approved course in instructor training;

Holds a diploma or certificate evidencing a high school education or the equivalent of a high school education;

Has no complaints filed against such person in the office of the commission that have not been satisfactorily resolved;

If the course concerns the principles of real estate, mathematics or sales techniques, is a licensed broker, or, with the approval of the commission, an affiliate broker, with at least five (5) years of experience in the subject of the course;

If the course concerns the law of real estate, has graduated from a law school accredited by the American Bar Association or approved by the state board of law examiners;

If the course concerns any other field in which a degree or other recognized designation is commonly awarded, has earned that degree or designation or has at least five (5) years of satisfactory experience in the field; and

If the course is offered for credit at a college or university, has either a master's degree and three (3) years of satisfactory experience in the area of instruction or a terminal degree in the area of instruction.

The commission may charge a fee of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each instructor in an education cycle in order to review the instructor's qualifications.

Before teaching the core course required every two (2) years by the real estate commission, an instructor shall demonstrate competency in the subject by taking an approved instructor course of at least four (4) hours on the subject matter being presented in the core course.

Before teaching a course on the law of agency, an instructor shall successfully complete an approved instructor course on agency.

The real estate commission shall approve any continuing education course that consists of a minimum of one (1) classroom hour in length; provided, that the course meets all of the requirements of the commission that are not related to course length. Any rule, policy, or requirement of the real estate commission that is in conflict with this subsection (e) is superseded.

Acts 2009, ch. 287, § 1; 2015, ch. 61, § 1.

62-13-325. Distance education courses.

“Distance education” shall be used interchangeably with “correspondence courses” and includes all education in which instruction does not take place in a traditional classroom setting but rather through other media where the teacher and student are separated by distance or by time. Distance education courses approved by the commission shall be completed within one (1) year of the date of enrollment in order for continuing education to be granted to the licensee. Distance education may include, but is not necessarily limited to, printed materials, computer based materials and on-line materials.

A distance education course using printed materials may be approved by the commission if:

Students will be provided a manual or other printed material;

A comprehensive course outline, requirements for successful completion of the course and information regarding availability of faculty to students are provided;

It contains at least six (6) written exercises that are to be submitted periodically to the instructor, graded and returned to the student; and

If the class provides more than eight (8) hours of credit, a comprehensive final examination or equivalent measure of achievement is executed prior to the sponsor submitting the roster to the commission indicating successful completion of the course for any and all students.

A distance education course using computer-based or online materials or formats may be submitted to the commission for analysis and possible approval if the course is certified by the Association of Real Estate License Law Officials (ARELLO) or other certifying body at the discretion of the commission, as to technology, support of the technology, interactivity and course design.

The commission shall review these certified courses on a case by case basis to determine whether the curriculum will meet commission education requirements.

Any course that would provide more than eight (8) hours of continuing education shall include a final examination that shall be executed prior to submission to the commission for education credit.

Approval of a course under this subsection (c) will be automatically withdrawn should certification by the respective certifying body be discontinued for any reason.

Any distance education version of the basic principles of real estate course required of applicants for an affiliate broker's license under § 62-13-303 shall include at least one (1) student interaction with a commission-approved instructor for every five (5) hours of credit.

Acts 2009, ch. 287, § 2.